Washington statutes.
RCW 18.200.090

Reciprocity.

An applicant holding a license in another state or a territory of the United States may be licensed to practice in this state without examination if the secretary determines that the other jurisdiction's credentialing standards are substantially equivalent to the standards in this jurisdiction.

[ 1997 c 285 s 10.]